Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHERBURNE COUNTY; US 10 AND CSAH 11 INTERCHANGE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) $2,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Sherburne County for property acquisition, environmental documentation, and engineering for the local road portions of an interchange at marked U.S. Highway 10 and Sherburne County State-Aid Highway 11 in Becker Township. This appropriation is available after the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient to complete the project as described in this section has been committed to the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. new text end new text begin (b) $2,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for property acquisition, environmental documentation, and engineering of the trunk highway portions of an interchange at marked U.S. Highway 10 and Sherburne County State-Aid Highway 11 in Becker Township. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sales. new text end new text begin (a) To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin (b) To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end